District of Columbia statutes.
31-5607.06

Consent to service of process.

(a)

An applicant for licensure or registration under this chapter, and every issuer that proposes to offer a security in the District through any person acting as an agent, shall file with the Commissioner, in such form as may be prescribed by rule, an irrevocable consent appointing the Commissioner to be the person’s attorney to receive service of any lawful process in any non-criminal suit, action, or proceeding against the person or the person’s successor, executor or administrator which arises under this chapter, or any rule or order hereunder, after the consent is filed, with the same force and validity as if served personally on the person filing the consent.

(b)

A person who has filed a consent complying with subsection (a) of this section in connection with a previous application for licensing, registration, or notice filing need not file an additional consent.

(c)

If any person, including a nonresident of the District, engages in conduct prohibited or made actionable by this chapter or a rule or order hereunder, and the person has not filed a consent to service of process under subsection (a) of this section, and personal jurisdiction over the person cannot otherwise be obtained in the District, the conduct shall be deemed the person’s appointment of the Commissioner to be the person’s attorney to receive service of any lawful process in any non-criminal suit, action, or proceeding against the person or the person’s successor, executor or administrator, which grows out of the conduct and which is brought under this chapter, or a rule or order adopted under this chapter, with the same force and validity as if served on the person personally.

(d)

Service under subsection (a) or (c) of this section may be made by leaving a copy of the process in the Commissioner’s office, but it shall not be effective unless:

(1)

The plaintiff, who may be the Commissioner in a suit, action, or proceeding instituted by the Commissioner, sends notice of the service and a copy of the process by registered or certified mail to the defendant or respondent at that person’s last address on file with the Commissioner, or takes other steps reasonably calculated to give actual notice; and

(2)

The plaintiff’s affidavit of compliance with this subsection is filed on or before the return day of the process, if any, or within such further time as the court or the Commissioner, in a proceeding before the Commissioner, allows.

(e)

Service as provided in subsection (d) of this section may be utilized in a proceeding before the Commissioner or by the Commissioner in a proceeding in which the Commissioner is the moving party.

(f)

When process is served under this section, the court, or the Commissioner, in a proceeding before the Commissioner, shall order such continuance as may be necessary to afford the defendant or respondent reasonable opportunity to defend.

Oct. 26, 2000, D.C. Law 13-203, § 706, 47 DCR 7837
This section is referenced in § 31-5602.03, § 31-5602.10, § 31-5603.02, § 31-5603.03, § 31-5603.04, and § 31-5603.08.